Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.310

Fees—Washington State University—Disposition of building fees.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5195-S.SL) ***

Within 35 days from the date of collection thereof, all building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the Washington State University building account.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University building account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings, equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. During the 2021-2023 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. During the 2023-2025 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State University building account may also be used for routine facility maintenance, utility costs, and facility condition assessments. Expenditures so made shall be accounted for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until appropriated by the legislature.

The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university, except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as authorized by law.

[ 2023 c 474 s 8025; 2021 c 332 s 7026; 2019 c 413 s 7024; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 953; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 3 s 7026; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 7028; 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7023. Prior: 2009 c 499 s 2; 2009 c 497 s 6020; 1985 c 390 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.310; prior: 1961 ex.s. c 11 s 2; 1935 c 185 s 1; 1921 c 164 s 2; RRS s 4570. Formerly RCW 28.80.040.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.

Effective date—2019 c 413: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 43.160.080.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 43.34.080.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 48: See note following RCW 39.35B.050.

Effective date—2009 c 497: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.